Utah statutes.
63A-3-202.   Comprehensive state accounting system -- Approval of agency accounting systems -- Cost accounting systems required.

(1)  The director of the Division of Finance shall establish a comprehensive state accounting system.

(2)  Officers, departments, agencies, and institutions of  Utah may create and maintain accounting systems only with the approval of the director.

(3)  The director may, with the approval of the executive director, require any department or institution to install and maintain a cost accounting system that will disclose the unit cost of material or service produced or performed by a department.

